Utah statutes.
26-8a-104.   Committee powers.
The committee shall adopt rules in accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah
Administrative Rulemaking Act, that:
(1)  establish certification and reciprocity requirements under Section
26-8a-302;
(2)  establish designation requirements under Section 26-8a-303;
(3)  promote the development of a statewide emergency medical services system
under Section 26-8a-203;
(4)  establish insurance requirements for ambulance providers;
(5)  provide guidelines for requiring patient data under Section 26-8a-203;
(6)  establish criteria for awarding grants under Section 26-8a-207;
(7)  establish requirements for the coordination of emergency medical services
and the medical supervision of emergency medical service providers under
Section 26-8a-306; and
(8)  are necessary to carry out the responsibilities of the committee as
specified in other sections of this chapter.
